Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2305
Domesticated cervine animal facility permit required; when.

On and after January 1, 2000, it is unlawful for any person to own, possess, buy, sell, or barter any domesticated cervine animal in this state unless such animal is individually identified and kept at a premises for which a domesticated cervine animal facility permit has been issued by the department. Permits shall be issued only after a determination that the applicant is in compliance with the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act. This section shall not be construed to require a municipal, state, or federal zoo, park, refuge, or wildlife area, a bona fide circus or animal exhibit, or any private, nonprofit zoological society to obtain a permit in order to own, possess, buy, sell, or barter a domesticated cervine animal, but such facilities shall be governed by the provisions of the act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder regarding the testing, control, and eradication of cervidae diseases including chronic wasting disease.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 38.